Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Termination of Parental Rights
§ 14-2-310.
Parties authorized to file petition.

The petition for the termination of the parent-child relationship shall be filed with the court by:

Either parent, when termination of the parent-child legal relationship is sought with respect to the other parent; or

The guardian or the legal custodian of the child; or

An authorized agency.

The petition for the termination of the parent-child relationship may be filed with the court by a biological or adoptive grandparent acting in loco parentis to the child, where the child has resided with the grandparent for a period of not less than one (1) year and the placement is not under the direction of a juvenile court or the department of family services.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 2019 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (b).

Cross references. —

As to commencement of actions generally, see Rule 3, W.R.C.P.

DFS is “authorized agency”. —

Department of Family Services (DFS), a public social service agency, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 9-2-2101(a), with authority to oversee the custody and care of children in cases of abuse and neglect under the Child Protection Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

, was an “authorized agency” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-2-308

and

14-2-310

with authority to file a petition to terminate a mother's parental rights, even though DFS did not have custody of the children. State v. DH (In the Interest of LB), 2014 WY 10, 316 P.3d 1184,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2014).

District court had jurisdiction to terminate parental rights because the district court had jurisdiction over the parents’ separate termination of parental rights proceedings and the Wyoming Department of Family Services was an agency authorized to file a termination of parental rights action. Hood v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re JPL), 2021 WY 94, 493 P.3d 174,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2021).

Commencement of termination proceedings. —

Termination of a mother's parental rights was not invalidated due to a decision not to place children with their maternal grandmother because the placement decision did not affect the mother's ability to visit the children or strengthen a relationship with them; moreover, that placement was unsuitable due to the grandmother's failure to cooperate and the fact that she lived with a convicted sex offender. In addition, the Wyoming Department of Family Services was not required to wait for a second home evaluation for the grandmother after she moved to a different state before commencing termination proceedings against the mother.
K.H. v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re D.H.), 2007 WY 196, 173 P.3d 365,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2007).

Assistance of counsel required. —

The department of family services and its director are not permitted to file a petition for parental termination without the assistance of counsel. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied in

In re HLL, 2016 WY 43,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Apr. 12, 2016).

Stated in

Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-2-311.
Contents of petition.

The petition for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship shall state:

The legal name, sex, date and place of birth of the child, if known, and the jurisdictional facts;

The name and residence of the petitioner and his relationship to the child;

The name, address and place and date of birth of the parent, if known, and of the name of the person having the legal custody or guardianship of the child;

The grounds for termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to W.S.

14-2-309

;

Name and address of the person or authorized agency requesting appointment as the guardian of the child.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated in

Johnson v. Calkins, 2017 WY 50, 393 P.3d 1316,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-2-312.
Hearing; appointment of guardian ad litem.

After the petition has been filed, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child unless the court finds the interests of the child will be represented adequately by the petitioner or another party to the action and are not adverse to that party. If the court appoints a guardian ad litem it shall approve a fee for services. When a petition is filed and presented to the judge, the judge shall set the petition for hearing. The Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, including the right of a parent, child or interested person to demand a jury trial, are applicable in actions brought under this act.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1985, ch. 86, § 2; 1993, ch. 109, § 1.

Cross references. —

For jury trial of right, see Rule 38, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-308(a)(ix).

Authority to appoint guardian ad litem.—

District court plainly had jurisdiction over a father’s petition to modify custody, and it had authority to use a guardian ad litem (GAL) to assist in deciding the petition, because when the father invoked the district court’s jurisdiction by filing a petition to modify custody and alleging a material change in circumstances the district court had before it a child custody matter and authority to appoint a GAL. Van Fleet v. Guyette, 2020 WY 78, 466 P.3d 812,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2020).

This section is unambiguous and mandatory. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-312

is an unambiguous mandatory statute that does not allow a district court discretion not to appoint a guardian ad litem or not to make the appropriate record findings that no guardian ad litem is required; furthermore, the requirement that mandatory statutes be obeyed is most compelling in cases where fundamental parent-child relationships are at risk of severance.
LM v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 189, 171 P.3d 1077,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Dec. 5, 2007).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-312

leaves no room for an assumption that the Department of Family Services will adequately represent the interests of children in a termination action.
LM v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 189, 171 P.3d 1077,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Dec. 5, 2007).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-312

is an unambiguous mandatory statute that requires a district court in a parental rights termination action either to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent involved children, or to make a finding that no guardian ad litem is necessary because the petitioner or another party to the action will adequately represent the interests of the children, and the interests of the children are not adverse to that party.
LM v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 189, 171 P.3d 1077,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Dec. 5, 2007).

Judgment terminating a mother's parental rights to her children was reversed and remanded because no guardian ad litem was appointed to represent the children in the proceedings, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-312

is an unambiguous mandatory statute that does not allow a district court discretion not to appoint a guardian ad litem or not to make the appropriate record findings that no guardian ad litem was required.
LM v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 189, 171 P.3d 1077,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Dec. 5, 2007).

Guardian ad litem entitled to fully participate in termination case.—

District court did not err by refusing to restrict the guardian ad litem's (GAL) participation in an action seeking to terminate a mother's parental rights because the GAL was entitled to fully participate in the action; regardless of whether the child was technically a party to the action, he had an interest and rights in the proceeding. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Termination
of parental rights cannot be based solely upon the best interests
of the child, however, that does not mean that the guardian ad litem
cannot participate in the evidentiary portion of the trial; the statutory
provisions setting forth the requirements for termination of parental
rights include factors directly related to the child's well-being. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

No order terminating parental rights may be entered in Wyoming without hearing.

Blair v. Supreme Court of Wyoming, 671 F.2d 389, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 21745 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

One has a statutory right to a jury trial in a parental-termination proceeding.

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Court must appoint attorney for child's interests before adjudicating termination issues. —

It is improper for the district court to adjudicate the substantive issues of termination of parental rights without appointing an attorney to protect the welfare of the child. In re Child X, 617 P.2d 1078,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Assistance of counsel required. —

The department of family services and its director are not permitted to file a petition for parental termination without the assistance of counsel. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Motion to set aside entry of default denied.—

District court exercised sound judgment to deny a mother’s motion to set aside the entry of default because it properly applied the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and reasonably considered the three factors; the Department of Family Services would be prejudiced by the delay to the permanent placement of the children, and the mother’s failure to respond to the petition to terminate her parental rights for approximately four months constituted culpable conduct that led to her default. Hurd v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re EMM), 2018 WY 36, 414 P.3d 1157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2018).

No reversal despite unjustified ex parte conference. —

An ex parte conference between the trial judge and the guardian ad litem appointed to represent the minor child of the parties could not be ethically justified, but did not require the reversal of an adjudication of child custody in a divorce action where no prejudicial error was manifested. Moore v. Moore, 809 P.2d 261,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1991).

Sufficiency of the Evidence. —

Party in default who has appeared at a parental rights termination hearing may challenge the sufficiency of the evidence in an appeal from an order terminating parental rights.
ZMETS v. State, 2012 WY 68, 276 P.3d 392,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982); In re Parental Rights of SCN, 659 P.2d 568,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1983); In Interest of SVG, 826 P.2d 237,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

In re Adoption of JLP, 774 P.2d 624,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1989); WR v. Natrona County Dep't of Family Servs., 916 P.2d 991,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment “Wyoming's New Termination of Parental Rights Statute,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 621 (1982).

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Consideration and weight of religious affiliations in appointment of guardian for child, 22 ALR2d 696.

Right of child to select his own guardian, 85 ALR2d 921.

Right of putative father to guardianship of illegitimate child, 45 ALR3d 216.

Right of indigent parent to appointed counsel in proceeding for involuntary termination of parental rights, 92 ALR5th 379.

§ 14-2-313.
Service of petition.

The petition shall be served on the following persons:

The parent of the child;

The guardian ad litem;

The guardian or next friend of the parent if the parent is a minor;

The department of family services if the child is or has been supported by public assistance funds.

Service of the petition on the person required to be served by subsection (a) of this section shall be made as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. If the person is a nonresident or his residence is unknown, service may be had by constructive service or by publication as provided in the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1993, ch. 109, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Service by publication. —

Adoption court did not err in granting the foster parents’ petition for adoption because service by publication upon an unknown father was proper at the time that it was completed, and the court in the termination case obtained jurisdiction over the parties and terminated the father’s parental rights; nothing on the face of the termination order or the record indicated that the district court subsequently lost jurisdiction; the father’s collateral attack on the termination order could not be maintained in the adoption case; and the father did not have standing to object to or otherwise participate in the adoption proceeding as his parental rights had already been terminated, and he had no legally protectable interest at stake. RB v. State (In re SSO), 2017 WY 142, 406 P.3d 723,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2017).

“Constructive service” allowed if procedural requirements followed. —

“Constructive service,” as applied in subsection (b), includes service by publication under Rule 4(e), W.R.C.P., and service for out-of-state residents under Rule 4(l), W.R.C.P. A petitioner has the right to use Rule 4 service of process to satisfy the service requirements of this section only if the procedural requirements delineated in the rule are accurately followed. Therefore, a petitioner's failure to properly conform to Rule 4(l)(2), W.R.C.P., when serving an out-of-state mother by registered mail in a termination proceeding, constituted inadequate service of process. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Answer not waiver of defense of defective service. —

In a parental termination proceeding, a parent did not waive her defense to an agency's defective service of process by filing an answer, where she had already appropriately attacked the inadequate service with a defensive motion to dismiss under Rule 12(b), W.R.C.P. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

If there was defective service, guardian ad litem waived objection by filing report

the morning of the trial. In re Parental Rights to ARW, 716 P.2d 353,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1986), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Stated in

Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-2-314.
Social study required; information to be shown; not excluded as hearsay.

Upon the filing of a petition by anyone other than an authorized agency as defined by W.S. 14-2-308(a)(ii)(A), the court shall direct that a social study be made by the appropriate county office of public assistance and social services or by any authorized agency to aid the court in making a final disposition of the petition. The social study shall state the factual information pertaining to the allegations in the petition, the social history and the present situation and environment of the child and parent. The social study shall not be excluded as evidence by reason of hearsay alone. The social study shall be made available to any party to the action upon request.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1985, ch. 86, § 2.

Hearsay rules apply where agency is party. —

Under this section, when a social study is independently made and an authorized agency is not the petitioner, the study is not solely inadmissible because of its character as hearsay. Where, however, the authorized agency is a party, this section does not apply to the submitted report and Rules 801 through 806, W.R.E., can operate to preclude its introduction. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Psychological studies of mentally retarded parents held ofno assistance. —

Psychological studies of selected mentally retarded married parents and their capabilities and success in the care of their children may be of interest to those engaged in that phase of psychology, but they offer no assistance in determining the cases brought under the provisions of this article. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976) (decided under prior law).

Noncompliance with this section was not prejudicial error.—

When the district court entered its decision letter concluding that the father's parental rights should be terminated, it was filed prior to the receipt of the social study required by this section; however, the father was not prejudiced. The decision letter was not a judgment, and the district court had the opportunity to consider the social study before issuing the order terminating parental rights.
JLW v. CAB (In re WDW), 2010 WY 9, 224 P.3d 14,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2010).

Section not violated. —

See In re Parental Rights to ARW, 716 P.2d 353,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1986), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982); In re Parental Rights of SCN, 659 P.2d 568,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1983); In re Adoption of BBC, 849 P.2d 769,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Zmets v. State, 2012 WY 68, 276 P.3d 392,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(May 16, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For comment “Wyoming's New Termination of Parental Rights Statute,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 621 (1982).

§ 14-2-315.
Order terminating the parent-child legal relationship; contents.

The order terminating the parent-child legal relationship shall be in writing and shall contain the findings of the court. If the court terminates the parent-child legal relationship of either one (1) or both parents, it shall fix the responsibility for the child’s support and appoint a guardian of the child’s person or estate or both.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1.

Quoted

in

In Interest of SVG, 826 P.2d 237,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nonresidence as affecting one's right to custody of child, 15 ALR2d 432.

Alienation of child's affections as affecting custody award, 32 ALR2d 1005.

§ 14-2-316.
Dismissal of petition; continuation of hearing.

If the court does not terminate the parent-child legal relationship, it shall dismiss the petition or direct an authorized agency to continue to make efforts to rehabilitate the parent and continue the hearing for no longer than six (6) months. The authorized agency shall provide the court with any additional reports regarding its rehabilitative efforts and results. Pending final hearing, the court may continue the present placement of the child or place the child in the temporary custody of an authorized agency and fix responsibility for temporary child support.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1.

Once parent-child relationship terminated, section inapplicable.—

Where the trial court properly decided to terminate the parent-child relationship, there was no need to determine whether the court abused its discretion in refusing to continue the hearing so that additional efforts to rehabilitate the father might occur, as this section was not applicable. In In Interest of JG, 742 P.2d 770,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 14-2-317.
Effect of order of termination.

An order terminating the parent-child legal relationship divests the parent of all legal rights and privileges and relieves the child of all duties to that parent except:

The order does not divest that parent of duties and support obligations unless otherwise specifically ordered by the court or the child is adopted; and

Except as provided in W.S. 2-4-107(a)(i), the right of the child to inherit from the parent shall not be affected by the order.

The parent whose parent-child legal relationship has been terminated is not thereafter entitled to the notice of proceedings for the adoption of the child, nor has he any right to object to the adoption or otherwise participate in the adoption proceedings.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1993, ch. 109, § 1; 2015 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(ii), added “Except as provided in W.S. 2-4-107(a)(i).”

No violation to award grandmother temporary custody. —

In a neglect action, a mother's parental rights were not violated by a temporary custody award to the grandmother, where the mother had already given up custody through the divorce decree when this case came before the juvenile court, and her rights as a parent remained intact in residual character. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

No standing to object to adoption. —

Adoption court did not err in granting the foster parents’ petition for adoption because service by publication upon an unknown father was proper at the time that it was completed, and the court in the termination case obtained jurisdiction over the parties and terminated the father’s parental rights; nothing on the face of the termination order or the record indicated that the district court subsequently lost jurisdiction; the father’s collateral attack on the termination order could not be maintained in the adoption case; and the father did not have standing to object to or otherwise participate in the adoption proceeding as his parental rights had already been terminated, and he had no legally protectable interest at stake. RB v. State (In re SSO), 2017 WY 142, 406 P.3d 723,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

In re Adoption of JLP, 774 P.2d 624,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

In re TLB, 771 P.2d 811,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1989); In re CH, 783 P.2d 155,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Stone v. Stone, 7 P.3d 887,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2000); Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003); DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Residual parental rights.—

Mother's claim that a permanency order should have designated the her preferred adoptive parents as the court-ordered adoptive parents had not been waived, but failed on the merits where the permanency order had not terminated the mother's parental rights or changed legal custody, and nothing in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) (2017) required findings as to the merits of the prospective adoption applicants. DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Mother’s claim that a permanency order should have designated the her preferred adoptive parents as the court-ordered adoptive parents had not been waived, but failed on the merits where the permanency order had not terminated the mother’s parental rights or changed legal custody, and nothing in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) (2017) required findings as to the merits of the prospective adoption applicants. DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-2-318.
Costs of proceedings; appointment of counsel.

The court may appoint counsel for any party who is indigent. Indigency shall be established by written affidavit signed and sworn to by the party or sworn testimony made a part of the record of the proceedings. The affidavit or sworn testimony shall state that the party is without sufficient money, property, assets or credit to employ counsel in his own behalf. The court may require further verification of financial condition as it deems necessary.

Where petitioner is an authorized agency as defined by W.S. 14-2-308(a)(ii)(B), it shall pay for the costs of the action. Costs shall include:

Fee for the guardian ad litem. If the agency had entered into an agreement with the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem, the program shall pay the fee for the guardian ad litem in accordance with that agreement;

Attorney’s fee for an indigent party;

Other professional fees incurred by an indigent party in defense of an action brought under this act.

Prior to incurring any cost under subsection (b) of this section application shall be made to the court and written approval by the court shall be obtained.

Where petitioner is an authorized agency as defined by W.S. 14-2-308(a)(ii)(A):

The district attorney for the county in which the petition is filed shall represent the authorized agency in all proceedings under this act;

The authorized agency shall pay the reasonable attorney’s fees and expenses for an indigent party incurred in the defense of an action brought under this act and approved by the court; and

The authorized agency shall pay the guardian ad litem reasonable fees and expenses approved by the court unless the agency had entered into an agreement with the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem. If so, the program shall pay the fee for the guardian ad litem in accordance with that agreement.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1985, ch. 86, § 2; 2012, ch. 76, § 3.

The 2012 amendment,

added the second sentence in (b)(i); and in (d)(iii), added “unless the agency had entered into an agreement with the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem” and the last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-308(a)(ix).

Assistance of counsel required. —

The department of family services and its director are not permitted to file a petition for parental termination without the assistance of counsel. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Reasonable fees. —

Trial court did not err in awarding an attorney 50 percent of the fees the attorney requested under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-318(a) and (b) for representing an indigent parent in a termination of parental rights proceeding because the attorney's billing entry of over four hours of legal research regarding a pretrial memorandum revealed that the attorney failed to exercise billing judgment.
Tolin v. State (In re NRF), 2013 WY 9, 294 P.3d 879,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2013), reh'g denied,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. Feb. 26, 2013).

Stated

in

Zmets v. State, 2012 WY 68, 276 P.3d 392,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(May 16, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 14-2-319.
Determination of indigency; recovery of payment.

In determining whether a person is an indigent party for purposes of W.S.

14-2-318

, the court shall consider in addition to any other relevant factors the person’s income, property owned, outstanding obligations and the number and ages of his dependents. In each case the person, subject to the penalties for perjury, shall certify in writing, or by other record, material facts relating to his ability to pay as the court prescribes.

To the extent that an indigent party is able to provide for an attorney or for other expenses incurred in defense of an action brought under this act, the court may order that he make payment within a specified period of time or in specified installments.

Within eight (8) years after the date the services were rendered, the attorney general may sue on behalf of the state to recover payment or reimbursement from each person who has received legal assistance or another benefit under this act:

To which he was not entitled;

With respect to which he was not an indigent person when he received it; or

With respect to which he has failed to make the certification required by subsection (a) of this section.

Within three (3) years after the date the services were rendered, the attorney general may sue on behalf of the state to recover payment or reimbursement from each person other than a person covered by subsection (c) of this section who:

Has received legal assistance or other benefit under this act; and

On the date on which suit is brought is financially able to pay or reimburse the state for all or part of the legal assistance or other benefit according to the standards of ability to pay applicable under this act but refuses to do so.

Amounts recovered under this section shall be remitted to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 86, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-308(a)(ix).

Cited

in

SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(2005).